Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 1 General Provisions Applicable to All Bonds and Notes Issued by Local Governments
9-21-109. Determination of costs of public works projects.

In determining the costs of any public works project for which bonds or notes are to be issued, the following items may also be included as a part of the cost of the public works project to be financed by the issuance of bonds or notes:

Engineering, architectural, art design services, inspection, legal and accounting expenses, and relocation expenses in connection with construction of a public works project;

The cost of issuance of the bonds or notes, including engraving, printing, advertising, credit enhancement, legal, fiscal and other similar expenses;

Any interest costs during the period of construction of a public works project and for six (6) months thereafter on any money borrowed or estimated to be borrowed;

Any moneys already spent by the local government from any of its funds for any of the foregoing expenses enumerated in subdivisions (1), (2) and (3), and upon the actual construction of a public works project in order to permit the construction of public works projects by the use of the funds of the local government if desired, and the later replacement of those funds by the sale of bonds or notes authorized by this chapter; and

The establishing of a reasonably required reserved fund for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds or notes.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-9; 1988, ch. 743, § 1; 1998, ch. 751, § 2.

9-21-110. Appointment of a fiscal agent.

Any local government has the power in connection with the issuance of bonds or notes to appoint a fiscal agent, to provide for the powers, duties, functions and compensation of such fiscal agent, to limit the liabilities of the fiscal agent, to prescribe a method for the resignation, removal, merger or consolidation of the fiscal agent, the appointment of a successor fiscal agent, and the transfer of rights and properties to the successor fiscal agent.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-10.

9-21-111. Execution of bonds and notes.

Bonds and notes issued under this chapter in registered form shall be executed in the manner provided for in the Tennessee Public Obligations Registration Act, compiled in chapter 19 of this title.

Bonds, notes, and any interest coupons attached thereto issued under this chapter which are not in registered form may, if so authorized by the governing body of the local government, bear or be executed with the facsimile signature of the chief executive officer of the local government; provided, that each bond, or note, shall be manually signed by the county clerk, by the city recorder or other similar local government official so authorized by resolution of the governing body of the local government.

When an official or corporate seal of the local government, its governing body or of any local government official is required or permitted in the execution of any bond, note or coupon, the seal may be printed, engraved, stamped, or otherwise placed in facsimile thereon. The facsimile seal has the same legal effect as the impression of the seal.

In case any official whose signature or facsimile signature appears on the bonds, notes or coupons shall cease to be such official before the delivery of the bonds, notes, or coupons to the purchaser, that signature shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes, as if that official had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds, notes or coupons.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-11; 1987, ch. 77, § 3.

9-21-112. Interim certificates.

Pending the preparation or delivery of definitive bonds or notes under this chapter, interim certificates or other temporary obligations may be issued by the local government to the purchaser of the bonds or notes. The interim certificates or other temporary obligations shall be in such form and contain such terms, conditions and provisions as the governing body of the local government may determine.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-12.

9-21-113. Deposit and custody of proceeds.

The proceeds received from the sale of bonds or notes issued under this chapter by a local government shall be deposited with, in the case of counties, the county trustee or, in the case of municipalities or metropolitan governments, with the official designated by law as custodian of the funds, or be deposited as provided in the resolution authorizing the bonds or notes.

The official designated as custodian of the funds shall not receive extra compensation for handling the funds.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-13; 1987, ch. 77, § 4.

9-21-114. Fees for reselling bonds or notes forbidden.

It is unlawful and deemed a misappropriation of public funds for any official to pay a fee other than underwriting discount to any person, group of persons, firm, company or corporation for selling bonds or notes issued by such official's local government after such bonds or notes have been sold. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the payment of fees for legal and fiscal services in connection with the issuance of bonds or notes. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the payment of a remarketing fee to a remarketing agent for remarketing services in connection with the resale of bonds or notes subject to repurchase on demand of the owner or subject to repurchase on demand of the local government.

Any local government official who unlawfully misappropriates public funds, in the manner set forth in subsection (a), shall be personally liable to the local government for the total amount of such unlawful misappropriation and reasonable attorney fees incident to the collection of such amount. A suit to recover the total amount for which a local government official is personally liable may be filed by any person who is a resident and taxpayer of the local government for general obligation bonds or notes, or by any person who is a user of the service provided in the case of revenue bonds or notes of the local government.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-14.

9-21-115. State control of public works projects.

This chapter shall not otherwise operate to dispense with the approval by a state department, board, officer or commission of a public works project where such approval under existing law must be obtained before a local government may construct a public works project.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-15.

9-21-116. Hotel and motel projects subject to tax.

In local governments of this state where a tax is imposed on hotel and motel accommodations, any hotel or motel built as a public works project under this chapter shall be subject to the collection of such a tax.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-16.

9-21-117. Tax exemption.

Any bonds or notes issued by a local government pursuant to this chapter and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation except for inheritance, transfer and estate taxes, and except as otherwise provided in this code.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-17.

Cross-References. Gift, estate, and inheritance taxes, title 67, ch. 8, parts 1-5.

9-21-118. Recital of issuance pursuant to this chapter.

A resolution authorizing bonds or notes under this chapter may provide that such bonds or notes shall contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to this chapter, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and the regularity of their issuance.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-18.

9-21-119. Validity of bonds and notes unaffected by certain irregularities.

The validity of the authorization and issuance of the bonds or notes authorized under this chapter shall not be dependent on or affected in any way by proceedings taken for the construction of any public works project or enterprise or contracts made in connection with the construction of any public works project or enterprise or by a failure to obtain the approval referred to in §9-21-115.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-19.

9-21-120. Bond and note issues validated.

All bonds and notes issued prior to July 1, 1986, and all proceedings theretofore taken to authorize the issuance of bonds or notes by any local government of this state for any purpose which is designated a public works project by this chapter, are hereby ratified, validated and confirmed, and such bonds and notes are hereby declared to be valid and legally binding obligations payable in accordance with their terms, notwithstanding any lack of power of the governing body of the local government to authorize and issue such bonds or notes and to provide for the payment thereof in the manner stated in such bonds or notes and in the proceedings authorizing their issuance, and further notwithstanding any defects or irregularities in any such proceedings, or the failure of any such proceedings, authorizing any such bonds or notes, to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or with any of the provisions of any other applicable section or chapter or any applicable general or special law or charter.

The disposition of proceeds of all capital outlay notes issued prior to January 15, 1998, for school purposes, by a county or metropolitan government which contains within its boundaries a special school district and/or incorporated town or city maintaining a public school system separate from the county or metropolitan government public school system, is hereby declared to be valid and legally binding unless proceedings which challenge the disposition of such proceeds have been instituted in any court in this state before January 15, 1998.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-20; 1998, ch. 903, § 1.

9-21-121. Impairment of contract.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed in any way to alter the terms of any agreements made with the holders of any outstanding bonds or notes of the local government or to authorize the local government to alter the terms of any such agreements, or to impair, or to authorize the local government to impair, the rights and remedies of any creditors of the local government.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-21.

9-21-122. Authorization to cancel bonds, notes and coupons.

Whenever any bonds, notes, or interest coupons shall be paid and discharged, they shall be cancelled by stamping and punching, immediately upon their redemption. The cancelled bonds, notes, and coupons shall be retained and be available for examination in annual audits subject to §9-21-123.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-22.

9-21-123. Authorization to destroy bonds, notes and coupons.

Subject to subsection (b), any local government may, by resolution duly adopted by its governing body, authorize and direct the paying agent for its bonds, notes and coupons, or other person in possession of its bonds, notes and coupons, to destroy all bonds, notes and coupons duly paid and cancelled.

Such bonds, notes and coupons duly paid and cancelled during any fiscal year may be destroyed only after the fiscal audit of the local government covering the fiscal year has been completed and the appropriate local government official shall have properly posted all bonds, notes and coupons duly paid and cancelled to the local government bond, note and coupon records on a current basis. If the audit reflects that all bonds, notes and coupons duly paid and cancelled have been properly accounted for, then the paying agents or other persons who have the local government's bonds, notes and coupons in their possession shall, at the direction of the local government, destroy the same and furnish a certified list of bonds, notes and coupons duly paid and cancelled by issue showing the bond, note and coupon number, the amount of each, the date paid and such additional information as the governing body may require. The governing body shall cause the certified list of bonds, notes and coupons duly paid and cancelled to be recorded in the official minutes of the governing body.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-23.

9-21-124. Supplementary nature — Transitional provisions — Interest rate agreements.

The powers conferred by this chapter shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law and not in substitution for the powers conferred by any other law; however, to the extent this law conflicts with any other law or is inconsistent with any other law, this chapter shall prevail with respect to all bonds and notes issued under this chapter. Bonds or notes may be issued hereunder for any public works project, notwithstanding that any other law may provide for the issuance of bonds or notes for like purposes and without regard to the requirements, restrictions or procedural provisions contained in any other law or any home rule charter, and notwithstanding any other provisions to the contrary contained in any other law or laws. Any proceedings heretofore taken by any local government relating to the subject matters hereof, whether or not commenced under any other law, may be continued hereunder, or at the option of the governing body, may be discontinued and new proceedings instituted under this chapter.

Prior to the adoption or promulgation by the state funding board of guidelines, rules or regulations with respect to the contracts and agreements authorized in §§ 9-21-213(d), 9-21-302(b), 9-21-305(c), 9-21-602(c), 9-21-907(c), 9-21-910(d), 9-21-1006(c) and 9-21-1008(c), a local government may enter into such contracts or agreements to the extent otherwise authorized in this chapter or in any other law notwithstanding §§ 9-21-213(d), 9-21-302(b), 9-21-305(c), 9-21-602(c), 9-21-907(c), 9-21-910(d), 9-21-1006(c) and 9-21-1008(c). Nothing in §§ 9-21-213(d), 9-21-302(b), 9-21-602(c), 9-21-907(c), 9-21-910(d), 9-21-1006(c) and 9-21-1008(c) is intended to alter any existing authority in this chapter or in any other law otherwise providing authority for a local government to enter into the contracts or agreements described in §§ 9-21-213(d), 9-21-302(b), 9-21-305(c), 9-21-602(c), 9-21-907(c), 9-21-910(d), 9-21-1006(c) and 9-21-1008(c) heretofore entered into or entered into prior to the adoption or promulgation by the state funding board of guidelines, rules or regulations.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-24; 1999, ch. 432, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Title 5, ch. 10, part 7, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 2.

Title 6, ch. 57, part 3, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 10.

9-21-125. Effectiveness and priority of pledges and liens.

Any pledge of, or lien on, revenues, fees, rents, tolls or other charges received or receivable by any local government to secure the payment of any bonds or notes issued by a local government pursuant to this chapter, and the interest thereon, shall be valid and binding from the time that the pledge or lien is created or granted and shall inure to the benefit of the holder or holders of any such bonds or notes until the payment in full of the principal thereof and premium and interest thereon.

The priority of any pledge or lien with respect to competing pledges or liens shall be determined by the date such pledge or lien is created or granted.

Neither the resolution nor any other instrument granting, creating, or giving notice of the pledge or lien need be filed or recorded to preserve or protect the validity or priority of such pledge or lien.

This section applies to all pledges of and liens on revenues, fees, rents, tolls or other charges received or receivable by any local government to secure the payment of any bonds or notes issued by a local government, whether created or granted before or after May 22, 1991, except such application does not affect the rights of persons to the extent their relative priorities were intended to be fixed by reference to any other provision of law prior to May 22, 1991.

Acts 1991, ch. 403, §§ 1, 2.

9-21-126. Advertisements for sale of bonds or notes.

An advertisement for sale of bonds or notes under this chapter may omit the date and time of sale, and in such event, the advertisement for sale shall set forth the manner in which the date and time of sale shall be subsequently published, which may be either by publication:

In the same financial journal and/or newspaper where the advertisement for sale is published; or

Via electronic communication systems deemed proper by the local government which is generally available to the financial community, in either case at least forty-eight (48) hours prior to the time fixed for such sale.

Acts 1994, ch. 806, § 10.

9-21-127. Bonds for certain unfunded pension obligations.

Local governments may issue general obligation bonds or revenue bonds under this part and parts 2 and 3 of this chapter for certain unfunded pension obligations or for not greater than fifty percent (50%) of the value of certain unfunded other post-employment benefits if such is approved by the state funding board after receiving a recommendation by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

A local government that issues bonds for certain unfunded pension obligations pursuant to § 9-21-105(4)(A)(iv) shall not be required to receive a recommendation by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee or the approval of the state funding board if:

The principal amount of the bonds is amortized over the term of the bonds such that the bonds are not balloon indebtedness, as defined in subdivision (b)(2); and

The local government has:

Adopted a debt management policy in compliance with guidelines promulgated by the state funding board;

Available for public inspection its financial statements prepared in compliance with generally accepted accounting principles for state and local governments with an unqualified auditor's opinion for the two (2) most recent fiscal years;

Presented to its governing body at a public hearing an explanation of the risk exposure associated with such bonds, economic and demographic assumptions used in the funding assumptions, alternative funding options considered, issuance costs associated with the proposed bonds and any conflicts of interest among the professionals involved (if disclosing such conflicts would not violate any rules of professional conduct);

Engaged or will engage a financial advisor, bond counsel and actuarial consultant in connection with the issuance of such bonds;

A full-time finance staff of at least three (3) persons; and

An audit committee.

As used in this subsection (b), “balloon indebtedness” means any bond:

Twenty percent (20%) or more of the principal amount of which is payable during any twelve-month period; or

Fifty percent (50%) or more of the principal amount of which is payable in the aggregate twenty (20) years or more after the date of issuance.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter to the contrary, any bonds issued pursuant to this section shall mature at such time or times not exceeding thirty (30) years from their respective dates and the proceeds from any bonds issued for certain unfunded other post-employment benefits shall be invested in accordance with an investment trust established pursuant to title 8, chapter 50, part 12.

Acts 1997, ch. 390, § 3; 2008, ch. 991, § 2; 2010, ch. 868, § 42; 2013, ch. 467, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning certain unfunded pension obligations for which local governments may issue bonds, please refer to Acts 2013, ch. 467.

9-21-128. Debt necessary to fund school building improvements, demolition or new construction.

Whenever the commissioner of education is authorized by the state board of education to take responsibility for the operation of any local school system or school that has been placed on probation pursuant to title 49, chapter 1, part 6, the state acting under the authority of the state building commission may issue debt necessary to fund school building improvements, demolition or new construction as approved by the commissioner and the state board of education. Such debt may be required to be repaid from any funds available to such local school system.

Acts 1998, ch. 737, § 2.

9-21-129. Proceeds to be shared among municipal or special school district systems.

Proceeds from the sale of bonds or notes issued pursuant to this chapter by a county or metropolitan government for school capital outlay purposes shall be shared with any municipal or special school district system within the county or metropolitan government on the same basis as is provided in § 49-3-1003. The trustee of the county or the treasurer of the metropolitan government shall pay over to the treasurer of the municipality or the special school district that amount of the proceeds which bears the same ratio to the entire amount of proceeds, net of all costs of issuance and sale of the bonds or notes, as the average daily attendance of the year ending June 30 immediately preceding the receipt of the proceeds of the respective municipality or special school district bears to the average daily attendance for the year ending June 30 immediately preceding the receipt of the proceeds of the entire county or metropolitan government.

The governing body of such municipality or special school district may, by regularly adopted resolution, waive its right to all or a part of any funds due under this section and return the funds to the trustee of the county or the treasurer of the metropolitan government for the purposes originally provided.

The proceeds of any bonds or notes issued for school capital outlay purposes shall not be required to be shared if the county or metropolitan government elects to pay for such bonds or notes pursuant to any applicable provision of § 49-3-1005(b) or (c).

Proceeds required to be shared pursuant to this section shall be shared at the time of the issuance of the bonds or notes.

The proceeds of any refunding bonds and notes issued pursuant to part 9 of this chapter to refund bonds or notes issued for school capital outlay purposes, the proceeds of bonds issued to retire capital outlay notes issued for school capital outlay purposes pursuant to part 6 of this chapter, the proceeds of bonds issued to retire bond anticipation notes issued for school capital outlay purposes, and notes issued to renew other notes issued for school capital outlay purposes, shall not be required to be shared as provided herein, unless the bonds or notes to be refunded, refinanced, renewed or extended are payable from taxes levied only upon a portion of the property in a county or metropolitan government as provided in § 49-3-1005(b), or are payable as provided in § 49-3-1005(c), and the instruments issued to accomplish such refinancing are payable from taxes to be levied on all taxable property in the county or metropolitan government.

Acts 1998, ch. 903, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Special school district — waiver of pro rata distribution of bond proceeds, OAG 00-004, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1 (1/6/00).

Cities, special school districts and counties may not change the statutory average daily attendance (ADA) measure; however, they may waive their rights to their portion, in whole or in part, of school bond proceeds, and, thus, distribution may not always follow the ADA ratio, OAG 05-134, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 136 (8/26/05).

9-21-130. Guidelines and rules and regulations relating to contracts and agreements authorized — Compliance with.

The state funding board shall establish guidelines, rules or regulations with respect to the agreements and contracts authorized in §§ 9-21-213(d), 9-21-302(b), 9-21-305(c), 9-21-602(c), 9-21-907(c), 9-21-910(d), 9-21-1006(c) and 9-21-1008(c), which may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

The conditions under which such agreements or contracts can be entered into;

The methods by which such contracts are to be solicited and procured;

The form and content such contracts shall take;

The aspects of risk exposure associated with such contracts;

The standards and procedures for counterparty selection, including rating criteria;

The procurement of credit enhancement, liquidity facilities, or the setting aside of reserves in connection with such contracts or agreements;

The methods of securing the financial interest in such contracts;

The methods to be used to reflect such contracts in the local government's financial statements;

Financial monitoring and periodic assessment of such contracts by the local government;

The application and source of non-periodic payments; and

Educational requirements for officials of any local government responsible for approving any such contract or agreement.

Prior to the adoption by the governing body of the local government of a resolution authorizing such contract or agreement, a request shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for a report finding that such contract or agreement is in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board. Within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the request, the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall determine whether the contract or agreement substantially complies with the guidelines, rules or regulations and shall report thereon to the local government. If the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finds that the contract or agreement complies with the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board or the comptroller of the treasury shall fail to report within the fifteen-day period, then the local government may take such action with respect to the proposed contract or agreement as it deems advisable in accordance with this section and the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board. If the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finds that such contract or agreement is not in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations, then the local government is not authorized to enter into such contract or agreement. The guidelines, rules or regulations shall provide for an appeal process to a determination of noncompliance.

Acts 1999, ch. 432, § 2.

9-21-131. Agreements concerning rights and remedies of parties — Jurisdiction — Applicable law.

When entering into any contracts or agreements authorized under this chapter, including contracts or agreements providing for liquidity and credit enhancement and reimbursement agreements relating thereto, interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, other interest rate hedging agreements, evidencing a transaction bearing a reasonable relationship to this state and also to another state or nation, the local government may agree in the written contract or agreement that the rights and remedies of the parties thereto shall be governed by the laws of this state or the laws of such other state or nation; provided, that jurisdiction over any local government against which an action on such a contract or agreement is brought shall lie solely in a court located in Tennessee which would otherwise have jurisdiction of actions brought in contract against such local government.

Acts 1999, ch. 432, § 2.

9-21-132. Sale of bonds at private sale by local government.

A local government shall have discretion until June 30, 2014, to sell bonds at private sale upon terms and conditions that it determines and upon approval by the governing body of the local government.

Subsection (a) shall apply to counties having a population greater than three hundred seven thousand (307,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and the municipality that is the county seat of the county.

Any local government may petition the state funding board for permission to sell specific bonds determined to be required to be sold at taxable interest rates at private sale upon terms and conditions that the local government determines and upon approval by the governing body of the local government.

Acts 2009, ch. 223, § 1; 2010, ch. 982, § 5; 2012, ch. 601, §§ 1-3.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 223, § 1 purported to add this section as §9-21-152; however, the code commission added this section as §9-21-132.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

9-21-133. Approval of comptroller of treasury required prior to issuance of balloon indebtedness — Evaluation of plan.

As used in this section:

“Balloon indebtedness”:

Means any indebtedness that:

Has a final term to maturity totaling thirty-one (31) or more years from the original date of issuance of the indebtedness to the date the indebtedness is fully amortized, including any subsequent refinancing thereof;

Delays principal repayment for more than three (3) years after the date of issuance;

Capitalizes interest beyond the later of the construction period or three (3) years from the date of issuance; or

Does not have substantially level or declining debt service; and

Does not include any indebtedness that:

Has at least seventy-five percent (75%) of total principal amortized within ten (10) years from the date of issuance with no more than twenty-five percent (25%) of principal subject to payment in any one (1) year;

Has a debt service schedule in which each annual principal installment is not more than fifty percent (50%) in excess of the smallest prior installment;

Has a general obligation pledge and is being issued by a local government or local government instrumentality that has some amount of long-term general obligation indebtedness outstanding or proposed to be issued that is rated in the highest rating category for long-term debt instruments (AAA/Aaa) or the first tier (AA+/Aa1) of the second highest rating category for long-term debt instruments by a nationally recognized rating agency for municipal securities, without regard to the effect of any credit agreement or other form of credit enhancement entered into in connection with such rated indebtedness;

Is secured solely by a revenue pledge and is being issued by a local government or local government instrumentality that has some amount of long-term revenue indebtedness outstanding or proposed to be issued that is rated in the highest rating category for long-term debt instruments (AAA/Aaa) or the first tier (AA+/Aa1) of the second highest rating category for long-term debt instruments by a nationally recognized rating agency for municipal securities, without regard to the effect of any credit agreement or other form of credit enhancement entered into in connection with such rated indebtedness;

State or federal law requires the local government or local government instrumentality to participate in the financing program;

Is a conduit transaction for a nongovernmental entity;

Is evidenced by a loan with either the United States department of agriculture or the United States department of housing and urban development; or

Is a note the issuance of which is otherwise subject to the approval of the comptroller of the treasury;

“Indebtedness” means:

Any bond, note, loan agreement or any other evidence of a debt obligation in which a local government or local government instrumentality, either directly or indirectly, incurs a definite and absolute obligation to the payment of the principal of and interest on the debt obligation; and

Does not include bonds and loan agreements authorized by title 7, chapter 53;

“Local government” means, solely for the purposes of this section, any incorporated city or town, metropolitan government, county, or utility district; and

“Substantially level or declining debt service” means an amortization schedule in which the aggregate amount of debt service calculated as principal plus interest that is payable in each year is not in excess of the lowest aggregate amount of debt service payable in any prior year by more than the greater of five percent (5%) or ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

For purposes of determining whether debt service is substantially level or declining in accordance with the preceding sentence, the first three (3) years of debt service do not need to be taken into account. For purposes of determining whether debt service is substantially level or declining on bonds issued with a variable interest rate, the average rate of interest at which fixed interest rate bonds of the same maturities would be sold should be estimated and the total principal amount should be amortized based upon such interest rate assumption.

For purposes of this section, principal of debt will be treated as being payable or amortized upon its stated maturity, upon any mandatory redemption date, and upon any date on which the holder of the debt has the option to require the debt to be prepaid, redeemed, or purchased, other than with the proceeds of a liquidity facility provided by a third party.

Solely for purposes of this section, a local government may account for the amortization of principal and the payment of debt service on:

A fiscal year basis;

A calendar year basis; or

An annual basis commencing on the date upon which debt is issued.

On and after July 1, 2014, if any local government or local government instrumentality proposes to issue any balloon indebtedness, then the local government or local government instrumentality shall first obtain approval from the comptroller of the treasury in accordance with subsection (e).

Prior to the adoption by the local government or local government instrumentality of any action authorizing the issuance of balloon indebtedness, the local government or local government instrumentality shall submit a plan of balloon indebtedness to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for approval. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may request any additional information as may be required to properly review the proposed plan of balloon indebtedness. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall evaluate each plan of balloon indebtedness based on the plan's particular circumstances and shall approve the plan only if a determination is made that the repayment structure is in the public's interest.

The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall report the comptroller's approval or disapproval of the plan of balloon indebtedness to the governing body within fifteen (15) business days after receipt of the plan and all requested supplemental documentation. After receiving the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee of the plan of balloon indebtedness or after the expiration of fifteen (15) business days from the date the plan of balloon indebtedness is received by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee and no disapproval having been reported by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, whichever date is earlier, the governing body may take such action with reference to the proposed plan of balloon indebtedness as it deems advisable in accordance with this part.

The state funding board is authorized to establish guidelines, rules, or regulations with respect to the comptroller of the treasury's approval of balloon indebtedness and may exempt certain classes or issues of indebtedness from such approval.

Acts 2014, ch. 766, § 5; 2018, ch. 498, § 1; T.C.A. §9-21-134.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this section from Acts 2014, ch. 529, § 2 has not been codified because the code commission has determined that Acts 2014, ch. 766, § 5 supersedes it.This section was renumbered from §9-21-134 to §9-21-133 by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 529, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Anti-Kicking the Can Act”.